Texas, session 892, HB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter H, Chapter 2155, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 2155.454 to read as follows: Sec. 2155.454.  PREFERENCE FOR PURCHASE OF GOODS AND SERVICES USED IN DISASTER AREA. (a)  In this section, "disaster area" means an area of this state that has been declared a disaster area by: (1)  the governor under Chapter 418; or (2)  the president of the United States under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Section 5121 et seq.). (b)  The comptroller and each state agency procuring goods or services for use in a disaster area shall give preference to bidders whose principal place of business is located in the political subdivision in which the goods will be used or services provided. (c)  The preference required by this section applies beginning on the date the area is declared a disaster area and ending on the first anniversary of that date, regardless of the date of any termination or expiration of the disaster declaration. (d)  The comptroller and each state agency procuring goods and services shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the comptroller and each state agency procuring goods and services shall adopt rules as necessary to implement Section 2155.454, Government Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 3.  Section 2155.454, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a contract for which the request for offers, bids, proposals, qualifications, or other applicable expressions of interest is made public on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.